src/Korektor/sr-Latn.aff
FLAG num
SFX 1359 Y 27
SFX 1359 ngati ngati
SFX 1359 ngati ngam
SFX 1359 ngati ngaš
SFX 1359 ngati nga
SFX 1359 ngati ngamo
SFX 1359 ngati ngate
SFX 1359 ngati ngaju
SFX 1359 ngati ngao
SFX 1359 ngati ngala
SFX 1359 ngati ngalo
SFX 1359 ngati ngali
SFX 1359 ngati ngale
SFX 1359 ngati ngaću
SFX 1359 ngati ngaćeš
SFX 1359 ngati ngaće
SFX 1359 ngati ngaćemo
SFX 1359 ngati ngaćete
SFX 1359 ngati ngaće
SFX 1359 ngati ngaj
SFX 1359 ngati ngajmo
SFX 1359 ngati ngajte
SFX 1359 ngati ngah
SFX 1359 ngati ngaše
SFX 1359 ngati ngasmo
SFX 1359 ngati ngaste
SFX 1359 ngati njgahu
SFX 1359 ngati ngajući

SFX 1360 Y 27
SFX 1360 niti niti
SFX 1360 niti nim
SFX 1360 niti niš
SFX 1360 niti ni
SFX 1360 niti nimo
SFX 1360 niti nite
SFX 1360 niti ne
SFX 1360 niti nio
SFX 1360 niti nila
SFX 1360 niti nilo
SFX 1360 niti nili
SFX 1360 niti nile
SFX 1360 niti niću
SFX 1360 niti nićeš
SFX 1360 niti niće
SFX 1360 niti nićemo
SFX 1360 niti nićete
SFX 1360 niti niće
SFX 1360 niti ni
SFX 1360 niti nimo
SFX 1360 niti nite
SFX 1360 niti nih
SFX 1360 niti niše
SFX 1360 niti nismo
SFX 1360 niti niste
SFX 1360 niti njahu
SFX 1360 niti neći

SFX 1361 Y 28
SFX 1361 liti liti
SFX 1361 liti lim
SFX 1361 liti liš
SFX 1361 liti li
SFX 1361 liti limo
SFX 1361 liti lite
SFX 1361 liti le
SFX 1361 liti lio
SFX 1361 liti lila
SFX 1361 liti lilo
SFX 1361 liti lili
SFX 1361 liti lile
SFX 1361 liti liću
SFX 1361 liti lićeš
SFX 1361 liti liće
SFX 1361 liti lićemo
SFX 1361 liti lićete
SFX 1361 liti liće
SFX 1361 liti li
SFX 1361 liti limo
SFX 1361 liti lite
SFX 1361 liti lih
SFX 1361 liti li
SFX 1361 liti liše
SFX 1361 liti lismo
SFX 1361 liti liste
SFX 1361 liti ljahu
SFX 1361 liti livši

SFX 1362 Y 27
SFX 1362 ivati ivati
SFX 1362 ivati ujem
SFX 1362 ivati uješ
SFX 1362 ivati uje
SFX 1362 ivati ujemo
SFX 1362 ivati ujete
SFX 1362 ivati uju
SFX 1362 ivati ivao
SFX 1362 ivati ivala
SFX 1362 ivati ivalo
SFX 1362 ivati ivali
SFX 1362 ivati ivale
SFX 1362 ivati ivaću
SFX 1362 ivati ivaćeš
SFX 1362 ivati ivaće
SFX 1362 ivati ivaćemo
SFX 1362 ivati ivaćete
SFX 1362 ivati ivaće
SFX 1362 ivati uj
SFX 1362 ivati ujmo
SFX 1362 ivati ujte
SFX 1362 ivati ivah
SFX 1362 ivati ivaše
SFX 1362 ivati ivasmo
SFX 1362 ivati ivaste
SFX 1362 ivati ivahu
SFX 1362 ivati ujući

SFX 1363 Y 38
SFX 1363 gnuti gnuti
SFX 1363 gnuti gnem
SFX 1363 gnuti gneš
SFX 1363 gnuti gne
SFX 1363 gnuti gnemo
SFX 1363 gnuti gnete
SFX 1363 gnuti gnu
SFX 1363 gnuti gnuo
SFX 1363 gnuti gnula
SFX 1363 gnuti gnulo
SFX 1363 gnuti gnuli
SFX 1363 gnuti gnule
SFX 1363 gnuti gao
SFX 1363 gnuti gla
SFX 1363 gnuti glo
SFX 1363 gnuti gli
SFX 1363 gnuti gle
SFX 1363 gnuti gnuću
SFX 1363 gnuti gnućeš
SFX 1363 gnuti gnuće
SFX 1363 gnuti gnućemo
SFX 1363 gnuti gnućete
SFX 1363 gnuti gnuće
SFX 1363 gnuti gni
SFX 1363 gnuti gnimo
SFX 1363 gnuti gnite
SFX 1363 gnuti gnuh
SFX 1363 gnuti gnu
SFX 1363 gnuti gnuše
SFX 1363 gnuti gnusmo
SFX 1363 gnuti gnuste
SFX 1363 gnuti gnuhu
SFX 1363 gnuti goh
SFX 1363 gnuti že
SFX 1363 gnuti goše
SFX 1363 gnuti gosmo
SFX 1363 gnuti goste
SFX 1363 gnuti gnuvši

SFX 1364 Y 28
SFX 1364 iti iti
SFX 1364 iti im
SFX 1364 iti iš
SFX 1364 iti i
SFX 1364 iti imo
SFX 1364 iti ite
SFX 1364 iti e
SFX 1364 iti io
SFX 1364 iti ila
SFX 1364 iti ilo
SFX 1364 iti ili
SFX 1364 iti ile
SFX 1364 iti iću
SFX 1364 iti ićeš
SFX 1364 iti iće
SFX 1364 iti ićemo
SFX 1364 iti ićete
SFX 1364 iti iće
SFX 1364 iti i
SFX 1364 iti imo
SFX 1364 iti ite
SFX 1364 iti ih
SFX 1364 iti i
SFX 1364 iti iše
SFX 1364 iti ismo
SFX 1364 iti iste
SFX 1364 iti ahu
SFX 1364 iti ivši

SFX 1365 Y 29
SFX 1365 niti niti
SFX 1365 niti nim
SFX 1365 niti niš
SFX 1365 niti ni
SFX 1365 niti nimo
SFX 1365 niti nite
SFX 1365 niti ne
SFX 1365 niti nio
SFX 1365 niti nila
SFX 1365 niti nilo
SFX 1365 niti nili
SFX 1365 niti nile
SFX 1365 niti niću
SFX 1365 niti nićeš
SFX 1365 niti niće
SFX 1365 niti nićemo
SFX 1365 niti nićete
SFX 1365 niti niće
SFX 1365 niti ni
SFX 1365 niti nimo
SFX 1365 niti nite
SFX 1365 niti nih
SFX 1365 niti ni
SFX 1365 niti niše
SFX 1365 niti nismo
SFX 1365 niti niste
SFX 1365 niti njahu
SFX 1365 niti neći
SFX 1365 niti nivši

SFX 1366 Y 27
SFX 1366 eti eti
SFX 1366 eti im
SFX 1366 eti iš
SFX 1366 eti i
SFX 1366 eti imo
SFX 1366 eti ite
SFX 1366 eti i
SFX 1366 eti eo
SFX 1366 eti ela
SFX 1366 eti elo
SFX 1366 eti eli
SFX 1366 eti ele
SFX 1366 eti eću
SFX 1366 eti ećeš
SFX 1366 eti eće
SFX 1366 eti ećemo
SFX 1366 eti ećete
SFX 1366 eti eće
SFX 1366 eti i
SFX 1366 eti imo
SFX 1366 eti ite
SFX 1366 eti eh
SFX 1366 eti eše
SFX 1366 eti esmo
SFX 1366 eti este
SFX 1366 eti ehu
SFX 1366 eti eći

SFX 1367 Y 30
SFX 1367 diti diti
SFX 1367 diti dijem
SFX 1367 diti diješ
SFX 1367 diti dije
SFX 1367 diti dijemo
SFX 1367 diti dijete
SFX 1367 diti diju
SFX 1367 diti dim
SFX 1367 diti diš
SFX 1367 diti di
SFX 1367 diti dio
SFX 1367 diti dila
SFX 1367 diti dilo
SFX 1367 diti dili
SFX 1367 diti dile
SFX 1367 diti diću
SFX 1367 diti dićeš
SFX 1367 diti diće
SFX 1367 diti dićemo
SFX 1367 diti dićete
SFX 1367 diti diće
SFX 1367 diti dij
SFX 1367 diti dijmo
SFX 1367 diti dijte
SFX 1367 diti dih
SFX 1367 diti diše
SFX 1367 diti dismo
SFX 1367 diti diste
SFX 1367 diti đahu
SFX 1367 diti deći

SFX 1368 Y 27
SFX 1368 ebiti ebiti
SFX 1368 ebiti ebim
SFX 1368 ebiti ebiš
SFX 1368 ebiti ebi
SFX 1368 ebiti ebimo
SFX 1368 ebiti ebite
SFX 1368 ebiti ebe
SFX 1368 ebiti ebio
SFX 1368 ebiti ebila
SFX 1368 ebiti ebilo
SFX 1368 ebiti ebili
SFX 1368 ebiti ebile
SFX 1368 ebiti ebiću
SFX 1368 ebiti ebićeš
SFX 1368 ebiti ebiće
SFX 1368 ebiti ebićemo
SFX 1368 ebiti ebićete
SFX 1368 ebiti ebiće
SFX 1368 ebiti ebi
SFX 1368 ebiti ebimo
SFX 1368 ebiti ebite
SFX 1368 ebiti ebih
SFX 1368 ebiti ebiše
SFX 1368 ebiti ebismo
SFX 1368 ebiti ebiste
SFX 1368 ebiti abljahu
SFX 1368 ebiti ebeći

SFX 1369 Y 27
SFX 1369 diti diti
SFX 1369 diti dim
SFX 1369 diti diš
SFX 1369 diti di
SFX 1369 diti dimo
SFX 1369 diti dite
SFX 1369 diti de
SFX 1369 diti dio
SFX 1369 diti dila
SFX 1369 diti dilo
SFX 1369 diti dili
SFX 1369 diti dile
SFX 1369 diti diću
SFX 1369 diti dićeš
SFX 1369 diti diće
SFX 1369 diti dićemo
SFX 1369 diti dićete
SFX 1369 diti diće
SFX 1369 diti di
SFX 1369 diti dimo
SFX 1369 diti dite
SFX 1369 diti dih
SFX 1369 diti diše
SFX 1369 diti dismo
SFX 1369 diti diste
SFX 1369 diti đahu
SFX 1369 diti deći

SFX 1370 Y 27
SFX 1370 ati ati
SFX 1370 ati im
SFX 1370 ati iš
SFX 1370 ati i
SFX 1370 ati imo
SFX 1370 ati ite
SFX 1370 ati e
SFX 1370 ati ao
SFX 1370 ati ala
SFX 1370 ati alo
SFX 1370 ati ali
SFX 1370 ati ale
SFX 1370 ati aću
SFX 1370 ati aćeš
SFX 1370 ati aće
SFX 1370 ati aćemo
SFX 1370 ati aćete
SFX 1370 ati aće
SFX 1370 ati i
SFX 1370 ati imo
SFX 1370 ati ite
SFX 1370 ati ah
SFX 1370 ati aše
SFX 1370 ati asmo
SFX 1370 ati aste
SFX 1370 ati ahu
SFX 1370 ati eći

SFX 1371 Y 27
SFX 1371 leti leti
SFX 1371 leti lim
SFX 1371 leti liš
SFX 1371 leti li
SFX 1371 leti limo
SFX 1371 leti lite
SFX 1371 leti le
SFX 1371 leti leo
SFX 1371 leti lela
SFX 1371 leti lelo
SFX 1371 leti leli
SFX 1371 leti lele
SFX 1371 leti leću
SFX 1371 leti lećeš
SFX 1371 leti leće
SFX 1371 leti lećemo
SFX 1371 leti lećete
SFX 1371 leti leće
SFX 1371 leti li
SFX 1371 leti limo
SFX 1371 leti lite
SFX 1371 leti leh
SFX 1371 leti leše
SFX 1371 leti lesmo
SFX 1371 leti leste
SFX 1371 leti ljahu
SFX 1371 leti leći

SFX 1372 Y 36
SFX 1372 tati tati
SFX 1372 tati ćem
SFX 1372 tati ćeš
SFX 1372 tati će
SFX 1372 tati ćemo
SFX 1372 tati ćete
SFX 1372 tati ću
SFX 1372 tati tam
SFX 1372 tati taš
SFX 1372 tati ta
SFX 1372 tati tamo
SFX 1372 tati tate
SFX 1372 tati taju
SFX 1372 tati tao
SFX 1372 tati tala
SFX 1372 tati talo
SFX 1372 tati tali
SFX 1372 tati tale
SFX 1372 tati taću
SFX 1372 tati taćeš
SFX 1372 tati taće
SFX 1372 tati taćemo
SFX 1372 tati taćete
SFX 1372 tati taće
SFX 1372 tati ći
SFX 1372 tati ćimo
SFX 1372 tati ćite
SFX 1372 tati taj
SFX 1372 tati tajmo
SFX 1372 tati tajte
SFX 1372 tati tah
SFX 1372 tati taše
SFX 1372 tati tasmo
SFX 1372 tati taste
SFX 1372 tati tahu
SFX 1372 tati ćući
