src/Korektor/sr-Latn.dic
bangati/1359
baštiniti/1365
bdeti/1366
bditi/1367
bebiti/1368
beleti/1371
benetati/1372
besjediti/1369
bježati/1370
blagovoleti/1371
blediti/1369
blečati/1370
bleštati/1370
bliještati/1370
bluditi/1369
blještati/1370
boleti/1371
braniti/1360
brečati/1370
briždati/1370
broditi/1369
brujati/1370
bučati/1370
vaditi/1369
vileniti/1360
voleti/1371
vrgnuti/1363
vrečati/1370
vrhuniti/1360
vrčati/1370
gaditi/1369
glediti/1369
gnjileti/1371
gorditi/1369
gospoditi/1369
gotovaniti/1360
grditi/1369
divaniti/1360
dobegnuti/1363
dovoditi/1369
doljepljivati/1362
domognuti/1363
domoliti/1361
dopičiti/1364
dostignuti/1363
docniti/1360
drečati/1370
duvaniti/1360
đoniti/1360
ždrebiti/1368
ždrijebiti/1368
žežati/1370
želeti/1371
žlebiti/1368
žlijebiti/1368
žljebiti/1368
žuditi/1369
zabacivati/1362
zabeliti/1361
zaveriti/1364
zavrgnuti/1363
zaglibljivati/1362
zadrignuti/1363
zažagriti/1364
zažvaliti/1361
zakačivati/1362
zakovrčiti/1364
zalegnuti/1363
zaljubljivati/1362
zamliječiti/1364
zanemarivati/1362
zaokoliti/1361
zapiljiti/1364
zapovrgnuti/1363
zaprskivati/1362
zasoliti/1361
zastrašivati/1362
zastrignuti/1363
zasužnjiti/1364
zahoditi/1369
zaceliti/1361
začahurivati/1362
zbičiti/1364
zviždati/1370
zvoniti/1360
zvučati/1370
zejtiniti/1360
zlijediti/1369
zrniti/1360
izbegnuti/1363
izbijeliti/1361
izvitoperivati/1362
izgnječiti/1364
izmognuti/1363
izmoliti/1361
izmudrijašiti/1364
iznajmljivati/1362
iskolačiti/1364
iskorišćivati/1362
isprašiti/1364
istegnuti/1363
istrebljivati/1362
istruliti/1361
ishoditi/1369
iscigančiti/1364
jaraniti/1360
jediti/1369
jeseniti/1360
ječati/1370
kameniti/1360
katraniti/1360
kvrčati/1370
kmečati/1370
kopniti/1360
kormaniti/1360
kreštati/1370
kruniti/1360
kuditi/1369
lebdeti/1366
ledeniti/1360
ležati/1370
lijeniti/1360
luditi/1369
mečati/1370
mileti/1371
mladiti/1369
mrsomuditi/1369
mučati/1370
navrzivati/1362
nagnuti/1363
nagoniti/1360
nagrliti/1361
nadvoditi/1369
nadmašiti/1364
nadopunjivati/1362
najvoleti/1371
nakiseliti/1361
nameračiti/1364
napenaljivati/1362
narogušiti/1364
nategnuti/1363
naćuliti/1361
našepuriti/1364
nuditi/1369
obeliti/1361
obeštećivati/1362
ovjeriti/1364
odvrgnuti/1363
odgoniti/1360
odeliti/1361
odleđivati/1362
odmjeriti/1364
odstrijeliti/1361
ožegnuti/1363
oivičiti/1364
okrunjivati/1362
opaliti/1361
optužiti/1364
osvešćivati/1362
osmeliti/1361
otegnuti/1363
otopliti/1361
othoditi/1369
otcjepljivati/1362
pirjaniti/1360
pišmaniti/1360
pištati/1370
pleniti/1360
pobeležiti/1364
pobjegnuti/1363
poganiti/1360
poguliti/1361
podvoditi/1369
podjarivati/1362
podstrignuti/1363
pokaluđeriti/1364
polegnuti/1363
pooholiti/1361
popritegnuti/1363
porubljivati/1362
postrožiti/1364
potegliti/1361
potpomognuti/1363
prevaliti/1361
pregrađivati/1362
prekardašiti/1364
premrežati/1370
prenapregnuti/1363
preraspoređivati/1362
preseliti/1361
pretegnuti/1363
prethoditi/1369
privrgnuti/1363
prigoniti/1360
prigorčiti/1364
pridijeliti/1361
priženjivati/1362
pripomognuti/1363
pritegnuti/1363
pricepljivati/1362
probijeliti/1361
provoditi/1369
progovoriti/1364
prosvijetliti/1361
profinjivati/1362
prošegačiti/1364
prštati/1370
raditi/1369
ražegnuti/1363
razveseliti/1361
razlegnuti/1363
razmesivati/1362
razrakoliti/1361
razrušiti/1364
raspaliti/1361
raspoređivati/1362
roniti/1360
rukovoditi/1369
ruštati/1370
sagnuti/1363
saguliti/1361
samjeriti/1364
samosavlađivati/1362
sapuniti/1360
sveseliti/1361
sijediti/1369
sjemeniti/1360
slijediti/1369
smognuti/1363
spiriti/1364
srditi/1369
srubljivati/1362
staliti/1361
stegnuti/1363
sustegnuti/1363
sutoniti/1360
traštati/1370
trebiti/1368
trijebiti/1368
trniti/1360
trčati/1370
ubeliti/1361
uvoditi/1369
ugriješiti/1364
udomljivati/1362
užegnuti/1363
uzoholiti/1361
uknjižiti/1364
ulegnuti/1363
uljenjivati/1362
uobliti/1361
uokružiti/1364
uprćivati/1362
usmoliti/1361
uspušiti/1364
ustrgnuti/1363
utanačivati/1362
ušestostručiti/1364
fištati/1370
hiljaditi/1369
hiniti/1360
hujati/1370
cvileti/1371
cvrčati/1370
cediti/1369
ceniti/1360
cmileti/1371
čečati/1370
čileti/1371
činiti/1360
džudžati/1370
škoditi/1369
šteniti/1360
štrčati/1370
šuštati/1370
